Utah statutes.
36-20-2.   Judicial Rules Review Committee.
(1)  There is created a six member Judicial Rules Review Committee.
(2) (a)  The committee shall be composed of three members of the Senate, at
least one from each political party, appointed by the president of the Senate,
and three members of the House, at least one from each political party,
appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives.
(b)  Members shall serve for two-year terms or until their successors are
appointed.
(c)  A vacancy exists whenever a committee member ceases to be a member of the
Legislature or when a member resigns from the committee.  Vacancies shall be
filled by the appointing authority, and the replacement shall serve out the
unexpired term.
(d)  The members may meet as needed to review or recommend:
(i)  court rules or proposals for court rules;
(ii)  any conflicts between court rules or proposals for court rules and
statute or state constitution; and
(iii)  proposed legislative action relating to Subsections (2)(d)(i) and (ii).
